src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_POHATTA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 15 t~0 back
!!€  pohatta: pohatta+A+Sg+Nom # fat-cat
!!€  pohattoina: pohatta+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  pohatoissa: pohatta+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  pohattoihin: pohatta+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  pohatoihin: pohatta+A+Pl+Ill
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  A-final words with long vowels and syllable boundary

LEXICON ADJ_AINOA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 15 oa
!!€  ainoa: ainoa+A+Sg+Nom # singleton
!!€  ainoana: ainoa+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  ainoina: ainoa+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  ainoissa: ainoa+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  ainoihin: ainoa+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  ainoisiin: ainoa+A+Pl+Ill
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KORKEA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 15 ea
!!€  korkea: korkea+A+Sg+Nom # high
!!€  korkeana: korkea+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  korkeina: korkea+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  korkeissa: korkea+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  korkeihin: korkea+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  korkeisiin: korkea+A+Pl+Ill
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_JÄREÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 15 eä
!!€  järeä: järeä+A+Sg+Nom # rough
!!€  järeänä: järeä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  järeinä: järeä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  järeissä: järeä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  järeihin: järeä+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  järeisiin: järeä+A+Pl+Ill
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Lexicalised comparatives
!!  Most of the lexicalised comparatives are adjectives that go to this class.
!!  The comparatives that are not lexicalised inflect exactly the same, though
!!  some versions of morphology may cut off long comparative chains.

LEXICON ADJ_AIEMPI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 16 back
!!€  aiempi: aiempi+A+Sg+Nom # earlier
!!€  aiempana: aiempi+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  aiemmassa: aiempi+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  aiempina: aiempi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  aiemmista: aiempi+A+Pl+Ela
0:pi  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_LÄHEMPI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 16 front
!!€  lähempi: lähempi+A+Sg+Nom # closer
!!€  lähempänä: lähempi+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  lähemmässä: lähempi+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  lähempinä: lähempi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  lähemmistä: lähempi+A+Pl+Ela
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:m  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:mä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:m  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Long vowel stems

LEXICON ADJ_VAPAA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 17 a
!!€  vapaa: vapaa+A+Sg+Nom # free
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no other bisyllabic long vowel stems in adjectives

LEXICON ADJ_PEEAA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 18 aa
!!€  peeaa: peeaa+A+Sg+Nom # bust
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_MUU
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 18 uu
!!€  muu: muu+A+Sg+Nom # other
0:u  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_SYYPÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 18 ää
!!€  syypää: syypää+A+Sg+Nom # guilty
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no other monosyllabic long vowel stems for adjectives. For full
!!  listing of possibilities, see nouns.

LEXICON ADJ_GAY
!!  Some loan words inflect irregularly, either more along the written form or
!!  the pronunciation. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 21 gay
!!€  gay: gay+A+Sg+Nom # gay
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

!!  There are not many direct adjective loans in general.

!!  !Old e stems with i nominative
!!  Some of the old e stems have i nominative but e as stem vowel for singular
!!  forms. Most of these are not adjectives though, see full listing from the
!!  noun pages.
  
LEXICON ADJ_SUURI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 24~26 back
!!€  suuri: suuri+A+Sg+Nom # big
0:i  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_RA_ARCHAIC  ;


LEXICON ADJ_PIENI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 24~26 front
!!€  pieni: pieni+A+Sg+Nom # small
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aiempi+A:aiem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
alempi+A:alem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
edempi+A:edem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
ehompi+A:ehom  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
enempi+A:enem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
etelämpi+A:eteläm  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
gay+A:gay  ADJ_GAY  ;
grafiitinharmaa+A:grafiitinharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
harmaanruskea+A:harmaan#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
harmaanruskea+A:harmaanruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
heleä+A:hele  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
helmenharmaa+A:helmen#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
hiekanruskea+A:hiekanruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
hiirenharmaa+A:hiiren#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
himmeä+A:himme  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
hulppea+A:hulppe  ADJ_AINOA  ;
hunajanmakea+A:hunajan#make  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
huoltovapaa+A:huolto#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
huomionkipeä+A:huomionkipe  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
idempi+A:idem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
iltapimeä+A:ilta#pime  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
julkaisuvapaa+A:julkaisu#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
juohea+A:juohe  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
jäljempi+A:jäljem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
kaamea+A:kaame  ADJ_AINOA  ;
kamferivapaa+A:kamferi#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
kanelinruskea+A:kanelinruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
karamellinruskea+A:karamellin#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
karmea+A:karme  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
kauempi+A:kauem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
kellanruskea+A:kellan#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
kellanruskea+A:kellan#ruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
kellanvihreä+A:kellanvihre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
keltaharmaa+A:kelta#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
kiihkeä+A:kiihke  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
kivenharmaa+A:kiven#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
kopea+A:kope  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
korskea+A:korske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
kullanvihreä+A:kullanvihre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
kuuranvalkea+A:kuuran#valke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
kuurosokea+A:kuurosoke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
laidempi+A:laidem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
laiskansitkeä+A:laiskan#sitke  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
lattea+A:latte  ADJ_AINOA  ;
liidunvalkea+A:liidun#valke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
likempi+A:likem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
loppusileä+A:loppu#sile  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
luonnonharmaa+A:luonnon#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
lähempi+A:lähem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
lännempi+A:lännem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
mahonginruskea+A:mahongin#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
mielipuoli+A:mielipuol  ADJ_SUURI  ;
mielipuoli+A:mieli#puol  ADJ_SUURI  ;
mielipuoli+A:mielipuol  ADJ_SUURI  ;
mustaharmaa+A:musta#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
mustanruskea+A:mustan#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
mustanruskea+A:mustanruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
muu+A:mu  ADJ_MUU  ;
möyheä+A:möyhe  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
nuori+A:nuor  ADJ_SUURI  ;
nuuskanruskea+A:nuuskan#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
oliivinruskea+A:oliivin#ruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
pahempi+A:pahem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
parempi+A:parem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
peeaa+A:peea  ADJ_PEEAA  ;
perempi+A:perem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
pieni+A:pien  ADJ_PIENI  ;
pirteä+A:pirte  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
pitkänhuiskea+A:pitkän#huiske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
pohatta+A:pohat  ADJ_POHATTA  ;
pollea+A:polle  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
pullea+A:pulle  ADJ_AINOA  ;
punaisenharmaa+A:punaisenharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
puolikarkea+A:puolikarke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
puolipyöreä+A:puoli#pyöre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
puolisokea+A:puolisoke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
rotanharmaa+A:rotan#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
ruosteenruskea+A:ruosteen#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
ruosteenruskea+A:ruosteenruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
römeä+A:röme  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
savenharmaa+A:savenharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
sinisenharmaa+A:sinisenharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
sinivalkea+A:sini#valke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
sinivihreä+A:sini#vihre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
sisempi+A:sisem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
sorea+A:sore  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
suodatinkarkea+A:suodatin#karke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
suuri+A:suur  ADJ_SUURI  ;
syypää+A:syypä  ADJ_SYYPÄÄ  ;
syypää+A:syy#pä  ADJ_SYYPÄÄ  ;
syypää+A:syypä  ADJ_SYYPÄÄ  ;
taaempi+A:taaem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
taempi+A:taem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
tahmea+A:tahme  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
tasakorkea+A:tasa#korke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
tasaleveä+A:tasaleve  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
trustivapaa+A:trustivapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
tuonnempi+A:tuonnem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
tyhmänylpeä+A:tyhmän#ylpe  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
tyyni+A:tyyn  ADJ_PIENI  ;
uhkea+A:uhke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
ulompi+A:ulom  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
vaaleanharmaa+A:vaaleanharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
valkea+A:valke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
vanhempi+A:vanhem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
varhempi+A:varhem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
vauhtisokea+A:vauhtisoke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
verovapaa+A:vero#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
vihreä+A:vihre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
vähempi+A:vähem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
yhtäsuuri+A:yhtäsuur  ADJ_SUURI  ;
ylempi+A:ylem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
yöpimeä+A:yö#pime  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
äitiysvapaa+A:äitiys#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
